Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1117
Proof of occurrence of sporting event; prima facie evidence.

In any prosecution under this article in which it is necessary to prove the occurrence of a sporting event, a published report of its occurrence in any daily newspaper, magazine, or other periodically printed publication of general circulation shall be admissible in evidence and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the occurrence of the event.

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 11.